Maine, session 132, LD1066.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4308, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. R, §2, is
amended to read:
1-A. Limit on housing assistance. Except as provided in subsections subsection 1‑B
and 2, housing assistance provided pursuant to this chapter is limited to a maximum of 9 3
months during the period from July 1, 2012 to June 30, 2013 in a 12-month period per
household, except for temporary housing or emergency shelter as defined by rule by the
department.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4308, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. II, §1, is
further amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
A municipality may not exceed maximum levels of assistance established pursuant to
section 4305 for an applicant household for more than 30 days in a 12-month period when
assistance is granted for housing in a hotel, motel, inn or other lodging place as defined in
section 2491, subsection 7‑F.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4316-A, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 410, Pt. AAA,
§10, is amended to read:
1-A. Period of ineligibility. An applicant, whether an initial or repeat applicant, who
quits work or is discharged from employment due to misconduct as defined in Title 26,
section 1043, subsection 23, is ineligible to receive assistance for 120 180 days after the
applicant's separation from employment.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4316-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1993, c. 410, Pt. AAA, §10
and PL 2003, c. 689, Pt. B, §6, is further amended to read:
2. Municipal work program. A municipality may shall require that an otherwise
eligible person who is capable of working be required to perform work for the municipality
or work for a nonprofit organization, if that organization has agreed to participate as an
employer in the municipal work program, as a condition of receiving general assistance.
The municipality may also require recipients, as a part of the municipal work program, to
participate in a training, educational or rehabilitative program that would assist the recipient
in securing employment. The municipal work program is subject to the following
requirements.
A. A person may not, as a condition of general assistance eligibility, be required to do
any amount of work that exceeds the value of the net general assistance that the person
would otherwise receive under municipal general assistance standards. Any person
performing work under this subsection must be provided with net general assistance,
the value of which is computed at a rate of at least the State's minimum wage.
B. A person may not be required to work under this subsection for a nonprofit
organization if that work would violate a basic religious belief of that person.
C. An eligible person performing work under this subsection may not replace regular
municipal employees or regular employees of a participating nonprofit organization.
D. An eligible person in need of emergency assistance may not be required to perform
work under this subsection prior to receiving general assistance. An applicant who is
not in need of emergency assistance may be required to satisfactorily fulfill a workfare
Page 1 - 132LR2301(01)

413 requirement prior to receiving the nonemergency assistance conditionally granted to
424 that applicant.
E. Expenses related to work performed under this subsection by an eligible person
must be considered in determining the amount of net general assistance to be provided
to the person.
F. General assistance provided by a municipality for work performed by an eligible
person under this subsection must be:
(1) Included in the reimbursable net general assistance costs; and
(2) Itemized separately in reports to the Department of Health and Human Services
under section 4311.
G. A person may not be required to work under this subsection if that person is
physically or mentally incapable of performing the work assigned.